Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4231
Pool; limitation on liability.

Participation in the pool as members, the establishment of rates, forms, or procedures, or any other joint or collective action required by the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act shall not be the basis of any cause of action, criminal or civil liability, or penalty against the pool or any of its members or the board.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 31;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 41.